Hawaii statutes.
§651-69 Application form contents. The
application shall be made upon a verified petition of the judgment creditor
filed with the court showing:

(1) The fact that an execution has been levied upon
the real or personal property within sixty days prior to the filing of the
petition;

(2) A description of the real or personal property
and the name of the claimant of an exemption under subpart B or C;

(3) That the value of the real or personal property,
over and above all liens and encumbrances thereon recorded prior to the lien
under which sale is to be made, exceeds the amount of the real or personal
property exemption, if any; and

(4) That no previous execution arising out of the
same judgment has been levied upon the real or personal property. [L 1976, c
136, pt of §3; am L 1978, c 46, §5]

Revision Note

Pursuant to §23G-15, in:

(1) Paragraphs
(1) and (2), punctuation changed; and

(2) Paragraph
(3), punctuation changed and "and" added after ending punctuation.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next